Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3610
Commitment; treatment; expenses; payment by state.

The expenses incurred in the care, maintenance, and treatment of patients committed under the Tuberculosis Detection and Prevention Act shall be paid from state funds appropriated to the department for the purpose of entering into agreements to provide for the care, maintenance, and treatment of such patients and those other persons having communicable tuberculosis who voluntarily agree to and accept care and treatment.

Laws 1963, c. 399, § 10, p. 1277;

Laws 1972, LB 1492, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 661;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 93;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 577;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 35.